Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 272A Kentucky Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act
272A.5-020.
No power as member to bind association.

A member, solely by reason of being a member, may not act for or bind the limited cooperative association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 31, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-030.
Liability as member for association’s obligations.

Unless the articles of association otherwise provide, a debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited cooperative association is solely that of the association and is not the debt, obligation, or liability of a member solely by reason of being a member.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, under the written organic rules or under another written agreement, a member may agree to be obligated personally for any of the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the limited cooperative association.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not affect the liability of a member of a limited cooperative association for his or her own negligence, wrongful acts, or misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 32, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-040.
Right of member to information.

Not later than ten (10) business days after receipt of a demand made in a record, a limited cooperative association shall permit a member to obtain, inspect, and copy in the association’s principal office required information listed in KRS

272A.1-120

(1)(a) to (h) during regular business hours. A member need not have any particular purpose for seeking the information. The association is not required to provide the same information listed in KRS

272A.1-120

(1)(b) to (h) to the same member more than once during a six (6) month period.

On demand made in a record received by the limited cooperative association, a member may obtain, inspect, and copy in the association’s principal office required information listed in KRS

272A.1-120

(1)(i), (j), (l), (m), (p), and (r) during regular business hours, if:

The member seeks the information in good faith and for a proper purpose reasonably related to the member’s interest;

The demand includes a description with reasonable particularity of the information sought and the purpose for seeking the information;

The information sought is directly connected to the member’s purpose; and

The demand is reasonable.

Not later than ten (10) business days after receipt of a demand pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a limited cooperative association shall provide, in a record, the following information to the member that made the demand:

If the association agrees to provide the demanded information:

What information the association will provide in response to the demand; and

A reasonable time and place at which the association will provide the information; or

If the association declines to provide some or all of the demanded information, the association’s reasons for declining.

A person dissociated as a member may obtain, inspect, and copy information available to a member under subsection (1) or (2) of this section by delivering a demand in a record to the limited cooperative association in the same manner and subject to the same conditions applicable to a member under subsection (2) of this section if:

The information pertains to the period during which the person was a member in the association; and

The person seeks the information in good faith.

A limited cooperative association shall respond to a demand made pursuant to subsection (4) of this section in the manner provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Not later than ten (10) business days after receipt by a limited cooperative association of a demand made by a member in a record, but not more often than once in a six (6) month period, the association shall deliver to the member a record stating the information with respect to the member required by KRS

272A.1-120

(1)(q).

A limited cooperative association may impose reasonable restrictions, including nondisclosure restrictions, on the use of information obtained under this section. Except as to limitations set forth in organic rules to which a member requesting inspection has assented, in a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction under this subsection, the association has the burden of proving reasonableness.

A limited cooperative association may charge a person that makes a demand under this section the reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor and material.

A person that may obtain information under this section may obtain the information through an attorney or other agent. A restriction imposed on the person under subsection (7) of this section or by the organic rules applies to the attorney or other agent.

The rights stated in this section do not extend to a person as transferee.

The organic rules may require a limited cooperative association to provide more information than required by this section, and the organic rules may establish conditions and procedures for providing the information.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 33, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-050.
Annual meeting of members.

Members shall meet annually at a time provided in the organic rules or set by the board of directors not inconsistent with the organic rules.

An annual members meeting may be held inside or outside the Commonwealth of Kentucky at the place stated in the organic rules or selected by the board of directors not inconsistent with the organic rules.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, members may attend or conduct an annual members meeting through any means of communication if all members attending the meeting can communicate with each other during the meeting.

The board of directors shall report, or cause to be reported, at the association’s annual members meeting the association’s business and financial condition as of the close of the most recent fiscal year.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the board of directors shall designate the presiding officer of the association’s annual members meeting.

Failure to hold an annual members meeting does not affect the validity of any action by the limited cooperative association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 34, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-060.
Special meeting of members.

A special meeting of members may be called only:

As provided in the organic rules;

By a majority vote of the board of directors on a proposal stating the purpose of the meeting;

By demand in a record signed by members holding at least twenty percent (20%) of the voting power of the persons in any district or class entitled to vote on the matter that is the purpose of the meeting stated in the demand; or

By demand in a record signed by members holding at least ten percent (10%) of the total voting power of all the persons entitled to vote on the matter that is the purpose of the meeting stated in the demand.

A demand under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section shall be submitted to the officer of the limited cooperative association charged with keeping its records.

Any voting member may withdraw its demand under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section before receipt by the limited cooperative association of demands sufficient to require a special meeting of members.

A special meeting of members may be held inside or outside this state at the place stated in the organic rules or selected by the board of directors not inconsistent with the organic rules.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, members may attend or conduct a special meeting of members through the use of any means of communication if all members attending the meeting can communicate with each other during the meeting.

Only business within the purpose or purposes stated in the notice of a special meeting of members may be conducted at the meeting.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the presiding officer of a special meeting of members shall be designated by the board of directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 35, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-070.
Notice of members meeting.

A limited cooperative association shall notify each member of the time, date, and place of a members meeting at least ten (10) and not more than sixty (60) days before the meeting.

Unless the articles of association otherwise provide, notice of an annual members meeting need not include any purpose of the meeting.

Notice of a special meeting of members shall include each purpose of the meeting as contained in the demand under KRS

272A.5-060

(1)(c) or (d) or as voted upon by the board of directors under KRS

272A.5-060

(1)(b).

Notice of a members meeting shall be given in a record unless oral notice is reasonable under the circumstances.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 36, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-080.
Waiver of notice.

A member may waive notice of a members meeting before, during, or after the meeting.

A member’s participation in a members meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting unless the member objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the member’s arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 37, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-090.
Quorum of members.

Unless the organic rules otherwise require a greater number of members or percentage of the voting power, the voting member or members present at a members meeting constitute a quorum.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 38, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-100.
Voting by patron members — Determination of voting power of patron
member.

Except as provided by subsections (2) and (3) of this section, each patron member has one (1) vote.

The organic rules may allocate voting power among patron members on the basis of one (1) or a combination of the following:

One (1) member, one (1) vote;

Use or patronage;

Equity; or

If a patron member is a cooperative, the number of its patron members.

The organic rules may provide for the allocation of patron member voting power by districts or class, or any combination thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 39, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-110.
Voting by investor members.

If the organic rules provide for investor members, each investor member has one (1) vote, unless the organic rules otherwise provide. The organic rules may provide for the allocation of investor member voting power by class, classes, or any combination of classes.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 40, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-120.
Voting requirements for members.

If a limited cooperative association has both patron and investor members, the following rules apply:

The total voting power of all patron members may not be less than a majority of the entire voting power entitled to vote;

Action on any matter is approved only upon the affirmative vote of at least a majority of:

All members voting at the meeting unless more than a majority is required by Subchapter 4, 12, 15, or 16 of this chapter or the organic rules; and

Votes cast by patron members unless the organic rules require a larger affirmative vote by patron members; and

The organic rules may provide for the percentage of the affirmative votes that must be cast by investor members to approve the matter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 41, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-130.
Manner of voting — Proxies.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, voting by a proxy at a members meeting is prohibited. This subsection does not prohibit delegate voting based on district or class.

If voting by a proxy is permitted, a patron member may appoint only another patron member as a proxy and, if investor members are permitted, an investor member may appoint only another investor member as a proxy.

The organic rules may provide for the manner of and provisions governing the appointment of a proxy.

The organic rules may provide for voting on any question by ballot delivered by mail or voting by other means on questions that are subject to vote by members.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 42, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-140.
Action without a meeting.

Unless the organic rules require that action be taken only at a members meeting, any action that may be taken by the members may be taken without a meeting if each member entitled to vote on the action consents in a record to the action.

Consent under subsection (1) of this section may be withdrawn by a member in a record at any time before the limited cooperative association receives a consent from each member entitled to vote.

Consent to any action may specify the effective date or time of the action.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 43, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.5-150.
Districts and delegates — Classes of members.

The organic rules may provide for the formation of geographic districts of patron members and:

For the conduct of patron member meetings by districts and the election of directors at the meetings; or

That districts may elect district delegates to represent and vote for the district at members meetings.

A delegate elected under subsection (1)(b) of this section has one (1) vote unless voting power is otherwise allocated by the organic rules.

The organic rules may provide for the establishment of classes of members, for the preferences, rights, and limitations of the classes, and:

For the conduct of members meetings by classes and the election of directors at the meetings; or

That classes may elect class delegates to represent and vote for the class in members meetings.

A delegate elected under subsection (3)(b) of this section has one (1) vote unless voting power is otherwise allocated by the organic rules.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 44, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 6. Member’s Interest in Limited Cooperative Association

272A.6-010.
Member’s interest.

A member’s interest:

Is personal property;

Consists of:

Governance rights;

Financial rights; and

The right or obligation, if any, to do business with the limited cooperative association; and

May be in certificated or uncertificated form.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 45, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.6-020.
Patron and investor members’ interests.

Unless the organic rules establish investor members’ interests, a member’s interest is a patron member’s interest.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a limited cooperative association has investor members, while a person is a member of the association, the person:

If admitted as a patron member, remains a patron member;

If admitted as an investor member, remains an investor member; and

If admitted as a patron member and investor member, remains a patron and investor member if not dissociated in one (1) of the capacities.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 46, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.6-030.
Transferability of member’s interest.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the transferability of a member’s interest are subject to the Uniform Commercial Code as enacted in the Commonwealth of Kentucky in KRS Chapter 355.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a member’s interest other than financial rights is not transferable.

Unless a transfer is restricted or prohibited by the organic rules, a member may transfer the member’s financial rights in the limited cooperative association.

The terms of any restriction on transferability of financial rights shall be:

Set forth in the organic rules and the member records of the association; and

Conspicuously noted on any certificates evidencing a member’s interest.

A transferee of a member’s financial rights, to the extent the rights are transferred, has the right to share in the allocation of profits or losses and to receive the distributions to the member transferring the interest to the same extent as the transferring member. A transferee of a member’s financial rights does not become a member upon transfer of the financial rights unless the transferee is admitted as a member by the limited cooperative association and has no governance rights in the association.

Except as provided in the organic rules, a member who has conveyed all of the member’s financial rights shall remain a member.

A limited cooperative association need not give effect to a transfer under this section until the association has notice of the transfer.

A transfer of a member’s financial rights in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the organic rules is ineffective as to a person having notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 47, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.6-040.
Security interest and set-off.

A member or transferee may create an enforceable security interest in its financial rights in a limited cooperative association.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a member may not create an enforceable security interest in the member’s governance rights in a limited cooperative association.

The organic rules may provide that a limited cooperative association has a security interest in the financial rights of a member to secure payment of any indebtedness or other obligation of the member to the association. A security interest provided for in the organic rules is enforceable under, and governed by, Article 9 of KRS Chapter 355.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a member may not compel the limited cooperative association to offset financial rights against any indebtedness or obligation owed to the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 48, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.6-050.
Charging order.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which the judgment creditor of a member or the assignee of a member may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s limited financial rights in a limited cooperative association.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by a judgment creditor of a member or a member’s assignee, a court may charge the judgment debtor’s financial rights in the association with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of a transferee and shall have no right to participate in the management or to cause the dissolution of the association. The court may appoint a receiver of the share of the distributions due or to become due to the judgment debtor in respect of the financial rights and make all other orders, directions, accounts, and inquiries the judgment debtor might have made or which the circumstances of the case may require to give effect to the charging order.

A charging order constitutes a lien on and the right to receive distributions made with respect to the judgment debtor’s financial rights. A charging order does not of itself constitute an assignment of the financial rights.

The court may order a foreclosure upon the financial rights subject to the charging order at any time. The purchaser of the financial rights at the foreclosure sale has the rights of a transferee. At any time before foreclosure, the charged financial rights may be redeemed:

By the judgment debtor;

With property other than property of the association, by one (1) or more of the other members; and

With association property, by the association with the consent of all members whose financial rights are not so charged.

This section does not deprive a member or a member’s assignee of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the member’s or assignee’s financial rights.

The association is not a necessary part to an application for a charging order. Service of the charging order on an association may be made by the court granting the charging order or as the court should otherwise direct.

This section does not apply to the enforcement of a judgment by a limited cooperative association against a member of that association.

This section shall apply to the issuance of a charging order against the interest of a member or assignee of a member of a foreign limited cooperative association.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 49, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 193, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER 7. Marketing Contracts

272A.7-010.
Definition of marketing contract.

As used in this subchapter, “marketing contract” means a contract between a limited cooperative association and another person that need not be a patron member:

Requiring the other person to sell, or deliver for sale or marketing on the person’s behalf, a specified part of the person’s products, commodities, or goods exclusively to or through the association or any facilities furnished by the association; or

Authorizing the association to act for the person in any manner with respect to the products, commodities, or goods.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 50, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.7-020.
Marketing contracts — Title and enforcement.

If a marketing contract provides for the sale of products, commodities, or goods to a limited cooperative association, the sale transfers title to the association upon delivery or at any other specific time expressly provided by the contract.

A marketing contract may:

Authorize a limited cooperative association to create an enforceable security interest in the products, commodities, or goods delivered; and

Allow the association to sell the products, commodities, or goods delivered and pay the sales price on a pooled or other basis after deducting selling costs, processing costs, overhead, expenses, and other charges.

Some or all of the provisions of a marketing contract between a patron member and a limited cooperative association may be contained in the organic rules.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 51, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.7-030.
Duration of marketing contracts.

The initial duration of a marketing contract may not exceed ten (10) years, but the contract may be self-renewing for additional periods not exceeding five (5) years each. Unless the contract provides for another manner or time for termination, either party may terminate the contract by giving notice in a record at least ninety (90) days before the end of the current term.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 52, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.7-040.
Remedies for breach of marketing contract.

Damages to be paid to a limited cooperative association for breach or anticipatory repudiation of a marketing contract may be liquidated, but only at an amount or under a formula that is reasonable in light of the actual or anticipated harm caused by the breach or repudiation assessed as of the time of the making of the marketing contract. A provision that so provides is not a penalty or otherwise unreasonable.

Upon a breach of a marketing contract, whether by anticipatory repudiation or otherwise, a limited cooperative association may seek:

An injunction to prevent further breach; and

Specific performance.

The remedies in this section are in addition to any other remedies available to an association under law other than this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 53, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 8. Board of Directors — Officers

272A.8-010.
Board of directors.

A limited cooperative association shall have a board of directors of at least three (3) individuals, unless the association has fewer than three (3) members. If the association has fewer than three (3) members, the number of directors may not be fewer than the number of members.

The affairs of a limited cooperative association shall be managed by, or under the direction of, the board of directors. The board may adopt policies and procedures that do not conflict with the organic rules or this chapter.

An individual is not an agent for a limited cooperative association solely by being a director.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 54, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-020.
Liability as director for limited cooperative association’s obligations.

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited cooperative association is solely that of the association and is not a debt, obligation, or liability of a director solely by reason of being a director. An individual is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, for an obligation of an association solely by reason of being a director.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not affect the liability of a director of an association for his or her own negligence, wrongful acts, or misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 55, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-030.
Director qualifications.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, and subject to subsection (3) of this section, each director of a limited cooperative association shall be an individual who is a member of the association or an individual who is designated by an entity member for purposes of qualifying and serving as a director. Initial directors need not be members.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may be an officer or employee of the limited cooperative association.

If the organic rules provide for nonmember directors, the number of nonmember directors may not exceed:

One (1), if there are two (2) through four (4) directors;

Two (2), if there are five (5) through eight (8) directors; or

One-third (1/3) of the total number of directors if there are at least nine (9) directors.

The organic rules may provide qualifications for directors in addition to those in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 56, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-040.
Election of directors and composition of board.

Unless the organic rules require a greater number:

The number of directors that must be patron members may not be fewer than:

One (1), if there are two (2) or three (3) directors;

Two (2), if there are four (4) or five (5) directors;

Three (3), if there are six (6) through eight (8) directors; or

One-third (1/3) of the directors if there are at least nine (9) directors; and

A majority of the board of directors shall be elected exclusively by patron members.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a limited cooperative association has investor members, the directors who are not elected exclusively by patron members are elected by the investor members.

Subject to subsection (1) of this section, the organic rules may provide for the election of all or a specified number of directors by one (1) or more districts or classes of members.

Subject to subsection (1) of this section, the organic rules may provide for the nomination or election of directors by districts or classes, directly or by district delegates.

If a class of members consists of a single member, the organic rules may provide for the member to appoint a director or directors.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, cumulative voting for directors is prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided by the organic rules, subsection (5) of this section, or KRS

272A.3-020

,

272A.5-140

,

272A.5-150

, and

272A.8-090

, member directors shall be elected at an annual members meeting.

Every director of a limited cooperative association, by acceptance of election or appointment as a director, including by service, shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any action by, in the name of, or on behalf of the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 57, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-050.
Term of directors.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, and subject to subsections (3) and (4) of this section and KRS

272A.3-020

(5), the term of a director expires at the annual members meeting following the director’s election or appointment. The term of a director may not exceed three (3) years.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may be reelected.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a director continues to serve until a successor director is elected or appointed and qualifies or the director is removed, resigns, is adjudged incompetent, or dies.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director does not serve the remainder of the director’s term if the director ceases to qualify to be a director.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 58, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-060.
Resignation of director.

A director may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the limited cooperative association. Unless the notice states a later effective date, a resignation is effective when the notice is received by the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 59, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-070.
Removal of director.

Members may remove a director with or without cause.

A member or members holding at least ten percent (10%) of the total voting power entitled to be voted in the election of a director may demand removal of the director by one (1) or more signed petitions submitted to the officer of the limited cooperative association charged with keeping its records.

Upon receipt of a petition for removal of a director, an officer of the association or the board of directors shall:

Call a special meeting of members to be held not later than forty-five (45) days after receipt of the petition by the association; and

Mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to the members entitled to vote on the removal, and to the director to be removed, notice of the meeting which complies with KRS

272A.5-070

.

A director is removed if the votes in favor of removal are equal to or greater than the votes required to elect the director.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 60, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-080.
Suspension of director by board.

A board of directors may suspend a director if, considering the director’s course of conduct and the inadequacy of other available remedies, immediate suspension is necessary for the best interests of the association and the director is engaging, or has engaged, in:

Fraudulent conduct with respect to the association or its members;

Gross abuse of the position of director;

Intentional or reckless infliction of harm on the association; or

Any other behavior, act, or omission as provided by the organic rules.

A suspension under subsection (1) of this section is effective for thirty (30) days unless the board of directors calls and gives notice of a special meeting of members for removal of the director before the end of the thirty (30) day period, in which case the suspension is effective until adjournment of the meeting or the director is removed.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 61, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-090.
Vacancy on board.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a vacancy on the board of directors shall be filled:

Within a reasonable time by majority vote of the remaining directors until the next annual members meeting or a special meeting of members called to fill the vacancy; and

For the unexpired term by members at the next annual members meeting or a special meeting of members called to fill the vacancy.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a vacating director was elected or appointed by a class of members or a district:

The new director shall be of that class or district; and

The selection of the director for the unexpired term shall be conducted in the same manner as would the selection for that position without a vacancy.

If a member appointed a vacating director, the organic rules may provide for that member to appoint a director to fill the vacancy.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 62, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-100.
Remuneration of directors.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the board of directors may set the remuneration of directors and of nondirector committee members appointed under KRS

272A.8-170

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 63, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-110.
Board meetings.

A board of directors shall meet at least annually and may hold meetings inside or outside of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Unless the organic rules provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during this meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means shall be deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 64, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-120.
Board action without meeting.

Unless prohibited by the organic rules, any action that may be taken by a board of directors may be taken without a meeting if each director consents in a record to the action.

Consent under subsection (1) of this section may be withdrawn by a director in a record at any time before the limited cooperative association receives consent from all directors.

A record of consent for any action under subsection (1) of this section may specify the effective date or time of the action.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 65, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-130.
Meetings and notice.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a board of directors may establish a time, date, and place for regular board meetings, and notice of the time, date, place, or purpose of those meetings is not required.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, notice of the time, date, and place of a special meeting of a board of directors shall be given to all directors at least three (3) days before the meeting, the notice shall contain a statement of the purpose of the meeting, and the meeting is limited to the matters contained in the statement.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 66, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-140.
Waiver of notice of meeting.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may waive any required notice of a meeting of the board of directors in a record before, during, or after the meeting.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director’s participation in a meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting unless:

The director objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the director’s arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote in favor of or otherwise assent to the action taken at the meeting; or

The director promptly objects upon the introduction of any matter for which notice under KRS

272A.8-130

has not been given and does not thereafter vote in favor of or otherwise assent to the action taken on the matter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 67, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-150.
Quorum.

Unless the articles of association provide for a greater number, a majority of the total number of directors specified by the organic rules constitutes a quorum for a meeting of the directors.

If a quorum of the board of directors is present at the beginning of a meeting, any action taken by the directors present is valid even if withdrawal of directors originally present results in the number of directors being fewer than the number required for a quorum.

A director present at a meeting but objecting to notice under KRS

272A.8-140

(2) does not count toward a quorum.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 68, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-160.
Voting.

Each director shall have one (1) vote for purposes of decisions made by the board of directors.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present at a meeting is required for action by the board of directors.

Directors may not vote by proxy.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 69, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-170.
Committees.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a board of directors may create one (1) or more committees and appoint one (1) or more individuals to serve on a committee.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, an individual appointed to serve on a committee of a limited cooperative association need not be a director or member.

An individual who is not a director and is serving on a committee has the same rights, duties, and obligations as a director serving on the committee.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, each committee of a limited cooperative association may exercise the powers delegated to it by the board of directors, but a committee may not:

Approve allocations or distributions, except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors;

Approve or propose to the members action requiring approval of the members; or

Fill vacancies on the board of directors or any of its committees.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 70, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-180.
Fiduciary standards of directors — Conflict of interest.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

272A.8-190

:

The fiduciary duties a director owes to the limited cooperative association include the duty of loyalty and the duty of care set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section;

A director’s duty of loyalty to the limited cooperative association includes but is not limited to the following:

To account to the association and hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived by the director in the conduct and winding up of the association’s business or derived from a use by the director of association property, including the appropriation of a opportunity;

To refrain from dealing with the association in the conduct or winding up of association business as or on behalf of a party having an interest adverse to the association; and

To refrain from competing with the association in the conduct of association business before the dissolution of the association;

A director’s duty of care to the limited cooperative association and the members thereof in the conduct and winding up of association business includes but is not limited to acting with the care that a reasonable person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances and in a manner that the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the association;

A director does not violate a duty or obligation under this subchapter or under the association’s organic rules merely because the director’s conduct furthers the director’s own interest; and

A director may lend money to, act as a surety, guarantor, or endorser for, guarantee or assume one (1) or more specific obligations of, provide collateral for and transact other business with the limited cooperative association, and as to each loan or transaction the rights and obligations of the director are the same as those of a person who is not a director, subject to other applicable law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 71, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.8-190.
Other considerations of directors.

Unless the articles of association otherwise provide, in considering the best interests of a limited cooperative association, in discharging the duties of director, in conjunction with considering the long-and short-term interest of the association and its patron members, a director may consider:

The interest of employees, customers, and suppliers of the association;

The interest of the community in which the association operates; and

Other cooperative principles and values that may be applied in the context of the decision.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 72, effective July 12, 2012.